Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1010.5] Interference with reporting
an emergency or crime. (1) A person commits the offense of interference
with reporting an emergency or crime if the person intentionally or knowingly
prevents a victim or witness to a criminal act from calling a 911-emergency
telephone system, obtaining medical assistance, or making a report to a law
enforcement officer.

(2) Interference with the reporting of an
emergency or crime is a petty misdemeanor. [L 2001, c 294, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §710-1010.5

Act 294, Session Laws 2001, established interference with the
reporting of an emergency or crime as a petty misdemeanor. The legislature
found that perpetrators of domestic violence should not prevent victims and
witnesses from contacting authorities for assistance in preventing domestic
violence. House Standing Committee Report No. 1222.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next